dev/apertium-en-hi.hi.dix
<pardef n="/ke_pare__tam">
	<e><p><l>ne_ke_pare</l><r>ne_ke_pare<s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>ne_ke_pare</l><r>ne_ke_pare<s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>ne_ke_pare</l><r>ne_ke_pare<s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>ne_ke_pare</l><r>ne_ke_pare<s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>ne_ke_pare</l><r>ne_ke_pare<s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>ne_ke_pare</l><r>ne_ke_pare<s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>ne_ke_pare</l><r>ne_ke_pare<s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>ne_ke_pare</l><r>ne_ke_pare<s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>ne_ke_pare</l><r>ne_ke_pare<s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>ne_ke_pare</l><r>ne_ke_pare<s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>ne_ke_pare</l><r>ne_ke_pare<s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>ne_ke_pare</l><r>ne_ke_pare<s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/ke_viruxXp3__tam">
	<e><p><l>ne_ke_viruxXa</l><r>ne_ke_viruxXp3<s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>ne_ke_viruxXa</l><r>ne_ke_viruxXp3<s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>ne_ke_viruxXa</l><r>ne_ke_viruxXp3<s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>ne_ke_viruxXa</l><r>ne_ke_viruxXp3<s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>ne_ke_viruxXa</l><r>ne_ke_viruxXp3<s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>ne_ke_viruxXa</l><r>ne_ke_viruxXp3<s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>ne_ke_viruxXa</l><r>ne_ke_viruxXp3<s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>ne_ke_viruxXa</l><r>ne_ke_viruxXp3<s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>ne_ke_viruxXa</l><r>ne_ke_viruxXp3<s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>ne_ke_viruxXa</l><r>ne_ke_viruxXp3<s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>ne_ke_viruxXa</l><r>ne_ke_viruxXp3<s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>ne_ke_viruxXa</l><r>ne_ke_viruxXp3<s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/kI_jarUrawa_hE__tam">
	<e><p><l>ne_kI_jarUrawa_hE</l><r>ne_kI_jarUrawa_hE<s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>ne_kI_jarUrawa_hE</l><r>ne_kI_jarUrawa_hE<s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>ne_kI_jarUrawa_hE</l><r>ne_kI_jarUrawa_hE<s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>ne_kI_jarUrawa_hE</l><r>ne_kI_jarUrawa_hE<s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>ne_kI_jarUrawa_hE</l><r>ne_kI_jarUrawa_hE<s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>ne_kI_jarUrawa_hE</l><r>ne_kI_jarUrawa_hE<s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>ne_kI_jarUrawa_hE</l><r>ne_kI_jarUrawa_hE<s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>ne_kI_jarUrawa_hE</l><r>ne_kI_jarUrawa_hE<s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>ne_kI_jarUrawa_hE</l><r>ne_kI_jarUrawa_hE<s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>ne_kI_jarUrawa_hE</l><r>ne_kI_jarUrawa_hE<s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>ne_kI_jarUrawa_hE</l><r>ne_kI_jarUrawa_hE<s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>ne_kI_jarUrawa_hE</l><r>ne_kI_jarUrawa_hE<s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/kI_jarUrawa_pada_sakawI_hE__tam">
	<e><p><l>ne_kI_jarUrawa_pada_sakawI_hE</l><r>ne_kI_jarUrawa_pada_sakawI_hE<s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>ne_kI_jarUrawa_pada_sakawI_hE</l><r>ne_kI_jarUrawa_pada_sakawI_hE<s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>ne_kI_jarUrawa_pada_sakawI_hE</l><r>ne_kI_jarUrawa_pada_sakawI_hE<s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>ne_kI_jarUrawa_pada_sakawI_hE</l><r>ne_kI_jarUrawa_pada_sakawI_hE<s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>ne_kI_jarUrawa_pada_sakawI_hE</l><r>ne_kI_jarUrawa_pada_sakawI_hE<s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>ne_kI_jarUrawa_pada_sakawI_hE</l><r>ne_kI_jarUrawa_pada_sakawI_hE<s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>ne_kI_jarUrawa_pada_sakawI_hE</l><r>ne_kI_jarUrawa_pada_sakawI_hE<s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>ne_kI_jarUrawa_pada_sakawI_hE</l><r>ne_kI_jarUrawa_pada_sakawI_hE<s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>ne_kI_jarUrawa_pada_sakawI_hE</l><r>ne_kI_jarUrawa_pada_sakawI_hE<s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>ne_kI_jarUrawa_pada_sakawI_hE</l><r>ne_kI_jarUrawa_pada_sakawI_hE<s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>ne_kI_jarUrawa_pada_sakawI_hE</l><r>ne_kI_jarUrawa_pada_sakawI_hE<s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>ne_kI_jarUrawa_pada_sakawI_hE</l><r>ne_kI_jarUrawa_pada_sakawI_hE<s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/kI_jZarUrawa_nahIM_hE__tam">
	<e><p><l>ne_kI_jZarUrawa_nahIM_hE</l><r>ne_kI_jZarUrawa_nahIM_hE<s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>ne_kI_jZarUrawa_nahIM_hE</l><r>ne_kI_jZarUrawa_nahIM_hE<s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>ne_kI_jZarUrawa_nahIM_hE</l><r>ne_kI_jZarUrawa_nahIM_hE<s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>ne_kI_jZarUrawa_nahIM_hE</l><r>ne_kI_jZarUrawa_nahIM_hE<s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>ne_kI_jZarUrawa_nahIM_hE</l><r>ne_kI_jZarUrawa_nahIM_hE<s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>ne_kI_jZarUrawa_nahIM_hE</l><r>ne_kI_jZarUrawa_nahIM_hE<s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>ne_kI_jZarUrawa_nahIM_hE</l><r>ne_kI_jZarUrawa_nahIM_hE<s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>ne_kI_jZarUrawa_nahIM_hE</l><r>ne_kI_jZarUrawa_nahIM_hE<s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>ne_kI_jZarUrawa_nahIM_hE</l><r>ne_kI_jZarUrawa_nahIM_hE<s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>ne_kI_jZarUrawa_nahIM_hE</l><r>ne_kI_jZarUrawa_nahIM_hE<s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>ne_kI_jZarUrawa_nahIM_hE</l><r>ne_kI_jZarUrawa_nahIM_hE<s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>ne_kI_jZarUrawa_nahIM_hE</l><r>ne_kI_jZarUrawa_nahIM_hE<s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/meM__tam">
	<e><p><l>ne_meM</l><r>ne_meM<s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>ne_meM</l><r>ne_meM<s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>ne_meM</l><r>ne_meM<s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>ne_meM</l><r>ne_meM<s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>ne_meM</l><r>ne_meM<s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>ne_meM</l><r>ne_meM<s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>ne_meM</l><r>ne_meM<s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>ne_meM</l><r>ne_meM<s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>ne_meM</l><r>ne_meM<s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>ne_meM</l><r>ne_meM<s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>ne_meM</l><r>ne_meM<s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>ne_meM</l><r>ne_meM<s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="nA_kI_jarUrawa_hE"><i></i><par n="/kI_jarUrawa_hE__tam"/></e>
<e lm="ne_kI_jarUrawa_hE"><i></i><par n="/kI_jarUrawa_hE__tam"/></e>
<e lm="ne_ke_pare"><i></i><par n="/ke_pare__tam"/></e>
<e lm="ne_ke_viruxXp3"><i></i><par n="/ke_viruxXp3__tam"/></e>
<e lm="ne_kI_jarUrawa_hE"><i></i><par n="/kI_jarUrawa_hE__tam"/></e>
<e lm="ne_kI_jarUrawa_pada_sakawI_hE"><i></i><par n="/kI_jarUrawa_pada_sakawI_hE__tam"/></e>
<e lm="ne_kI_jZarUrawa_nahIM_hE"><i></i><par n="/kI_jZarUrawa_nahIM_hE__tam"/></e>
<e lm="ne_meM"><i></i><par n="/meM__tam"/></e>
